test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v1_tuoda_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tuođa - ei tsekattu: # Verb 'to bring'
     tuođa+V+Inf: tuođa
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuon
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tuot
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuopi
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tuoma
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tuotta
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuođhaan
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: toin
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: toit
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: toi
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: toima
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: toitta
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuothiin
     tuođa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tuonu
     tuođa+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tuotu
     tuođa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tuonheet
     tuođa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tuopa
     tuođa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tuovat
     tuođa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tuotava
     tuođa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tuotavat

     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: toisin
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: toisit
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tois
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: toisima
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: toisitta
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: tuotais
     tuođa+V+Pass+Cond: tuotais

     tuođa+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tuo
     tuođa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tuokkaa

     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tuomassa
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tuomasta
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tuomhaan
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tuomala
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tuomatta


  Verb - saađa - ok : # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     saađa+V+Inf: saađa
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saan
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: saat
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saapi
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: saama
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: saatta
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: saađhaan
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sain
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sait
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sai
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: saima
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: saitta
     saađa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: saathiin
     saađa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: saanu
     saađa+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: saatu
     saađa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: saanheet
     saađa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: saapa
     saađa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: saavat
     saađa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: saatava
     saađa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: saatavat

     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: saisin
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: saisit
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: sais
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: saisima
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: saisitta
     saađa+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: saatais
     saađa+V+Pass+Cond: saatais

     saađa+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: saa
     saađa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: saakkaa

     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: saamassa
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: saamasta
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: saamhaan
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: saamala
     saađa+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: saamatta

# Kaksitavuiset verbit saavat suffiksin -pA PrsPrc Sg nominatiivissa (Söderjolm 2017: 267). 
